src/fst/stems/symbol_strings.lexc
! strings that are not words, but in some ways act like they were
! weights are arbitrary; assuming these stems are rare and thus 11 is the max weight for a stem

LEXICON SymbolStrings
  ^Letters^Letters DotSmth ;
  
LEXICON DotSmth
   %.com+Symbol:%.com TypicalAcroFiat "weight: 11 " ;  
   %.ee+Symbol:%.ee TypicalAcroArmee "weight: 11 " ;
   %.fi+Symbol:%.fi TypicalAcroArmee "weight: 11 " ;
   %.fm+Symbol:%.fm TypicalAcroFiat "weight: 11 " ;
   %.net+Symbol:%.net TypicalAcroFiat "weight: 11 " ;
   %.org+Symbol:%.org TypicalAcroFiat "weight: 11 " ;
   %.ru+Symbol:%.ru TypicalAcroArmee "weight: 11 " ;
   %.ua+Symbol:%.ua TypicalAcroArmee "weight: 11 " ;
   
